Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,323
Liability.

A producer, retailer, or battery stewardship organization is not liable for any claim of a violation of antitrust laws or laws relating to fraudulent, deceptive, or unfair methods of competition or trade practices arising from conduct that complies with a battery stewardship plan approved under section 81-15,317.

Laws 2025, LB36, § 10.